District of Columbia statutes.
5-115.03

Neglect to make for offense committed in presence.

If any member of the police force shall neglect making any arrest for an offense against the laws of the United States committed in his presence, he shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by imprisonment in the District Jail or Penitentiary not exceeding 2 years, or by a fine not exceeding $500. A member of the police force who deals with an individual in accordance with § 24-604(b) shall not be considered as having violated this section.

R.S., D.C., § 400
Aug. 3, 1968, 82 Stat. 618, Pub. L. 90-452, § 2(b)
1981 Ed., § 4-142.
1973 Ed., § 4-143.